Hawaii statutes.
§457A-2 Implementation. (a) The
director shall implement the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with 42
United States Code sections 1395i-3 and 1396r, that relate to:

(1) The minimum requirements and standards for
certification as a nurse aide;

(2) Examination requirements, including the passing
score;

(3) Maintenance requirements for continued
certification on a biennial basis; and

(4) Implementation of a certified nurse aide
registry.

(b) The
director of health shall implement this chapter in accordance with 42 United
States Code sections 1395i-3 and 1396r, that relate to disciplining certified
nurse aides who are employed in:

(1) Nursing facilities participating in medicare and
medicaid programs; and

(2) Health care settings licensed or certified by the
department of health.

(c) The director of human services shall implement
this chapter in accordance with 42 United States Code sections 1395i-3 and 1396r,
that relate to training programs for nurse aides and recertification; provided
that recertification shall be required not less than every two years and the
number of continuing education hours required for recertification shall not
exceed twenty-four hours, except as specified by federal law. [L 1990, c 271,
pt of §1; am L 1994, c 185, §3(2); am L 2007, c 226, §6; am L 2009, c 108, §3;
am L 2016, c 21, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next